Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5088.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "community colleges and higher education funding source limitation act". Sec. 3. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 and for each fiscal year thereafter, not more than a total of $1,324,000,000.00 may be appropriated from the state school aid fund created in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 for purposes of providing funding to community colleges and higher education under articles II and III of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1801 to 388.1891. (2) If the limitation on the amount that may be appropriated from the state school aid fund described in subsection (1) is exceeded, general fund/general purpose money must be used to reimburse the state school aid fund the difference.